Hawaii statutes.
[§290-23] Sale or disposition of vehicle.
When a vehicle is abandoned, the owner of the vehicle repair business, or the
owner's authorized representative, after one public advertisement in a
newspaper of general circulation in the State, may negotiate a sale of the
vehicle or dispose of it as junk. [L 1969, c 178, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next